Hawaii statutes.
§155D-2 Grants;
qualified producer. (a) Applications for grants by qualified producers
shall be submitted on a form furnished by the department and shall be filed
with accompanying documentation of animal feed costs; provided that:

(1) The applicant shall
comply with applicable federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination
against any person on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion,
creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, or disability;

(2) The applicant shall
have applied for or received all applicable licenses or permits;

(3) The applicant shall
indemnify and hold harmless the State and its officers, agents, and employees
from all claims arising out of or resulting from the feed purchased;

(4) The subsidy shall not
be allowed within a fiscal quarter if the flock or herd size or, in the case of
fish or crustaceans, sale weight, falls five per cent or more below the
required minimum of:

(A) Thirty birds;

(B) Ten cows;

(C) Ten sows in any
two months of the applicable fiscal quarter;

(D) Twenty finished
beef cattle annually;

(E) Twenty-five
lactating milking goats;

(F) Thirty sheep,
lambs, or goats raised for meat annually; or

(G) Sales of five
hundred pounds of fish or crustaceans in the applicable fiscal quarter; and

(5) The department may
request an applicant to provide necessary information for the purposes of
verifying flock or herd size or sale weight, as applicable, and feed purchases.

(b) Documentation
of animal feed costs, as requested by the department, shall be filed for feed
purchased within the immediate preceding fiscal quarter of filing and shall be
effective for feed costs incurred after July 1, 2013.

(c) The applicant
shall submit a quarterly financial statement of farm revenues and expenses
along with other supporting documents as deemed necessary by the department,
and filed with the documentation of the feed costs. An annual financial
statement shall be filed with the department within ninety days following the
close of the business' fiscal year after June 28, 2013, for final
reconciliation of any reimbursement paid during the previous three quarters
within the fiscal year. The financial statements shall be certified as
accurate by the applicant and the preparer of the financial statement on forms
prepared by the department.

(d) Funds shall be
disbursed upon approval by the department to the qualifying producer for up to:

(1) Sixty per cent of the
feed costs incurred for production of poultry products;

(2) Forty per cent of the
feed costs incurred for milk production;

(3) Fifty per cent of the
feed costs incurred for pigs raised in Hawaii and slaughtered for local
consumption;

(4) Fifty per cent of the
feed costs for beef cattle raised in Hawaii and slaughtered in Hawaii for local
consumption;

(5) Fifty per cent of the
feed costs for sheep, lambs, and goats raised in Hawaii and slaughtered in
Hawaii for local consumption; or

(6) Fifty per cent of the
feed costs for fish or crustaceans raised in Hawaii and processed for local
consumption.

(e) Feed costs
shall be limited to only the feed fed to the qualifying flock, herd, fish, or
crustaceans and shall not include the feed purchases for resale or gift, or the
cost of transportation to Hawaii. In no case shall costs be reimbursed to a
qualified producer when, after evaluation and verification by the department,
the department determines that the amount of reimbursement will result in an
annual profit of more than:

(1) Twelve per cent for
milk producers;

(2) Eight per cent for
poultry producers;

(3) Eight per cent for
pork producers;

(4) Eight per cent for
beef producers;

(5) Eight per cent for
sheep, lamb, or goat meat producers; or

(6) Eight per cent for
seafood producers.

(f) The department
shall aggregate the total grant claims pursuant to this section and divide and
distribute the available grant funds on a pro rata basis. [L 2007, c 221, pt of
§2; am L 2013, c 200, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next